Illinois, session 104th, HB28.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Receivership Act. 6    Section 2. Definitions. In this Act:7    (1) "Adequate protection" means protection against the 8decrease in the value of a person's interest in property 9resulting from the turnover, stay, use, sale, or lease of such 10property during the receivership.11    (2) "Affiliate" means:12        (A) with respect to an individual:13            (i) a companion of the individual;14            (ii) a lineal ancestor or descendant, whether by 15        blood or adoption, of:16                (I) the individual; or17                (II) a companion of the individual;18            (iii) a companion of an ancestor or descendant 19        described in clause (ii);20            (iv) a sibling, aunt, uncle, great aunt, great 21        uncle, first cousin, niece, nephew, grandniece, or 22        grandnephew of the individual, whether related by the 23        whole or the half blood or adoption, or a companion of   HB0028 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1        any of them; or2            (v) any other individual occupying the residence 3        of the individual; and4        (B) with respect to a person other than an individual:5            (i) another person that directly or indirectly 6        controls, is controlled by, or is under common control 7        with the person;8            (ii) an officer, director, manager, member, 9        partner, employee, or trustee or other fiduciary of 10        the person; or11            (iii) a companion of, or an individual occupying 12        the residence of, an individual described in clause 13        (i) or (ii).14    (3) "Claim" means: 15        (A) a right to payment, whether or not such right is 16    reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, 17    contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, 18    legal, equitable, secured, or unsecured; or 19        (B) a right to an equitable remedy for breach of 20    performance if such breach gives rise to a right to 21    payment, whether or not such right to an equitable remedy 22    is reduced to judgment, fixed, contingent, matured, 23    unmatured, disputed, undisputed, secured, or unsecured.24    (4) "Collateral" means the property subject to a lien.25    (5) "Companion" means:26        (A) the spouse of an individual;  HB0028 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1        (B) the domestic partner of an individual;2        (C) another individual in a civil union with an 3    individual; or 4        (D) an individual sharing the same residence with 5    another individual. 6    (6) "Court" means a circuit court of this State. In the 7context of a foreign receiver, the court means the court of the 8state that appointed the foreign receiver.9    (7) "Debtor" means a person having an interest, other than 10a lien, in collateral, whether or not the person is liable for 11the secured obligation. The term includes a mortgagor.12    (8) "Executory contract" means a contract, including a 13lease, under which each party has an unperformed obligation 14and the failure of a party to complete performance would 15constitute a material breach.16    (9) "Foreign receiver" means a receiver appointed by a 17court in another state.18    (10) "Governmental unit" means an office, unit, 19department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other 20agency of this State or a subdivision of this State.21    (11) "Lien" means a charge against or interest in property 22to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation.23    (12) "Mortgage" means a record, however denominated, that 24creates or provides for a consensual lien on real property or 25rents, even if it also creates or provides for a lien on 26personal property.  HB0028 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    (13) "Mortgagee" means a person entitled to enforce an 2obligation secured by a mortgage.3    (14) "Mortgagor" means a person that grants a mortgage or 4a successor in ownership of the real property described in the 5mortgage.6    (15) "Owner" means the person for whose property or 7business a receiver is appointed.8    (16) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business 9trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, 10association, joint venture, governmental agency, public 11corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.12    (17) "Proceeds" means the following property: 13        (A) whatever is acquired on the sale, lease, license, 14    exchange, or other disposition of receivership property;15        (B) whatever is collected on, or distributed on 16    account of, receivership property; 17        (C) rights arising out of receivership property; 18        (D) to the extent of the value of receivership 19    property, claims arising out of the loss, nonconformity, 20    or interference with the use of, defects or infringement 21    of rights in, or damage to the property; or 22        (E) to the extent of the value of receivership 23    property and to the extent payable to the owner or secured 24    party, insurance payable by reason of the loss or 25    nonconformity of, defects or infringement of rights in, or 26    damage to the property.  HB0028 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    (18) "Property" means all of a person's right, title, and 2interest, both legal and equitable, in real and personal 3property, tangible and intangible, wherever located and 4however acquired. The term includes proceeds, products, 5offspring, rents, or profits of or from the property.6    (19) "Receiver" means a person appointed by the court as 7the court's agent, and subject to the court's direction, to 8take possession of, manage, and, if authorized by this Act or 9court order, transfer, sell, lease, license, exchange, 10collect, or otherwise dispose of receivership property.11    (20) "Receivership" means a proceeding in which a receiver 12is appointed.13    (21) "Receivership property" means the property of an 14owner which is described in the order appointing a receiver or 15a subsequent order. The term includes any proceeds, products, 16offspring, rents, or profits of or from the property.17    (22) "Record", used as a noun, means information that is 18inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored on an 19electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable 20form. 21    (23) "Rents" means all items that constitute leases, 22rents, and profits arising from real property under applicable 23State law.24    (24) "Secured obligation" means an obligation the payment 25or performance of which is secured by a security agreement.26    (25) "Secured party" means a person entitled to enforce a   HB0028 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1secured obligation. The term includes a mortgagee.2    (26) "Security agreement" means an agreement that creates 3or provides for a lien. The term includes a mortgage.4    (27) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or 5adopt a record:6        (A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or7        (B) to attach to or logically associate with the 8    record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.9    (28) "State" means a state of the United States, the 10District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin 11Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the 12jurisdiction of the United States. 13    Section 3. Notice and opportunity for hearing. 14    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the 15court may issue an order under this Act only after notice and 16opportunity for a hearing appropriate in the circumstances.17    (b) The court may issue an order under this Act:18        (1) without prior notice if the circumstances require 19    issuance of an order before notice is given;20        (2) after notice and without a prior hearing if the 21    circumstances require issuance of an order before a 22    hearing is held; or23        (3) after notice and without a hearing if no 24    interested party timely requests a hearing.25    (c) In connection with any sale of receivership property   HB0028 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1under Section 16 of this Act, notice shall be provided to:2    (1) the owner and all other persons having an interest in 3the property that would be affected by the sale;4    (2) with respect to any sale of real property, nonrecord 5claimants, unknown necessary parties, and unknown owners by 6publication in accordance with Sections 2-206 and 2-207 of the 7Code of Civil Procedure; and8    (3) such other persons as the court directs. 9    Section 4. Scope; exclusions. 10    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) or (c), 11this Act applies to a receivership for an interest in any one 12or more of the following:13        (1) in real property and any personal property related 14    to or used in operating the real property;15        (2) in personal property and fixtures; or16        (3) a person that is not an individual.17    (b) This Act does not apply to residential real estate as 18defined under Section 15-1219 of the Illinois Mortgage 19Foreclosure Law.20    (c) This Act does not apply to a receivership if the 21receiver is appointed under: (1) Section 58 of the Illinois 22Banking Act; (2) Section 10011 of the Savings Bank Act; (3) 23Section 15.1 of the Currency Exchange Act; (4) Section 6-9 of 24the Corporate Fiduciary Act; (5) Section 92 of the 25Transmitters of Money Act; (6) Section 15-1704 of the Illinois   HB0028 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1Mortgage Foreclosure Law; (7) Section 5 of the Nursing Home 2Care Act; or (8) any law of this State other than this Act in 3which the receiver is a governmental unit or an individual 4acting in an official capacity on behalf of the unit, except to 5the extent provided by the other law. Notwithstanding the 6foregoing, a governmental unit or an individual acting in an 7official capacity on behalf of the unit may elect for this Act 8to apply to a receivership to the extent not inconsistent with 9the other law.10    (d) This Act does not limit the authority of a court to 11appoint a receiver under law of this State other than this Act.12    (e) Unless displaced by a particular provision of this 13Act, the principles of law and equity supplement this Act. 14    Section 5. Power of court. The court that appoints a 15receiver under this Act has exclusive jurisdiction and 16authority:17        (a) to direct and control the receiver; 18        (b) over all receivership property wherever located;19        (c) to determine all controversies related to the 20    receivership or the collection, preservation, improvement, 21    disposition, and distribution of receivership property; 22    and 23        (d) over all matters otherwise arising in or relating 24    to the receivership, the receivership property, the 25    exercise of the receiver's powers, or the performance of   HB0028 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    the receiver's duties. 2    Section 6. Appointment of receiver. 3    (a) The court may appoint a receiver:4        (1) before judgment, to protect a party that 5    demonstrates an apparent right, title, or interest in 6    property that is the subject of the action, if the 7    property or its revenue-producing potential:8            (A) is being subjected to or is in danger of waste, 9        loss, dissipation, or impairment; or10            (B) has been or is about to be the subject of a 11        voidable transaction; 12        (2) after judgment:13            (A) to enforce or otherwise carry the judgment 14        into effect; or15            (B) to preserve nonexempt property pending appeal 16        or when an execution has been returned unsatisfied and 17        the owner refuses to apply the property in 18        satisfaction of the judgment;19        (3) in an action against a person that is not an 20    individual if:21            (A) the object of the action is the dissolution of 22        the person;23            (B) the person has been dissolved; 24            (C) the persons in control of the person are 25        deadlocked in the management of the person's affairs;  HB0028 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1            (D) the acts of the persons in control of the 2        person are illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent; or3            (E) the person is insolvent or generally is not 4        paying the person's debts as those debts become due;5        (4) in an action in which a receiver may be appointed 6    by law or on equitable grounds; or 7        (5) during the time allowed for redemption, to 8    preserve property sold in an execution or foreclosure sale 9    and secure its rents to the person entitled to the rents.10    (b) In connection with the foreclosure or other 11enforcement of a lien, the court may appoint a receiver for the 12collateral if:13        (1) appointment is necessary to protect the property 14    from waste, loss, transfer, dissipation, or impairment;15        (2) the debtor agreed in a signed record to 16    appointment of a receiver on default; 17        (3) the owner agreed, after default and in a signed 18    record, to appointment of a receiver;19        (4) the collateral and any other collateral security 20    held by the secured party are not sufficient to satisfy 21    the secured obligation;22        (5) the owner fails to turn over to the secured party 23    proceeds or rents the secured party was entitled to 24    collect; or25        (6) the holder of a subordinate lien obtains 26    appointment of a receiver for the property.  HB0028 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    (c) The court may appoint a receiver to prevent 2irreparable harm without prior notice under Section 3(b)(1) or 3without a prior hearing under Section 3(b)(2) and may 4condition such appointment on the giving of security by the 5person seeking the appointment for the payment of damages, 6reasonable attorney's fees, and costs incurred or suffered by 7any person if the court later concludes that the appointment 8was not justified. If the court later concludes that the 9appointment was justified, the court shall release the 10security. 11    Section 7. Disqualification from appointment as receiver; 12disclosure of interest. 13    (a) Any person, whether or not a resident of this State, 14may serve as a receiver unless the person is disqualified 15under this Act.16    (b) The court may not appoint a person as receiver unless 17the person submits to the court a statement under penalty of 18perjury that the person is not disqualified. 19    (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a 20person is disqualified from appointment as receiver if the 21person:22        (1) is an affiliate of a party or the judge presiding 23    over the receivership;24        (2) has an interest materially adverse to an interest 25    of a party;  HB0028 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1        (3) has a material financial interest in the outcome 2    of the action, other than compensation the court may allow 3    the receiver;4        (4) has a debtor-creditor relationship with a party;5        (5) holds an equity interest in a party, other than a 6    noncontrolling interest in a publicly traded company;7        (6) is a sheriff of any county; or8        (7) is otherwise prohibited from acting as an agent of 9    the court under the laws of this State.10    (d) A person is not disqualified from appointment as 11receiver solely because the person:12        (1) was appointed receiver or is owed compensation in 13    an unrelated matter involving a party or was engaged by a 14    party in a matter unrelated to the receivership; 15        (2) is an individual obligated to a party on a debt 16    that is not in default and was incurred primarily for 17    personal, family, or household purposes; or18        (3) maintains with a party a deposit account as 19    defined in Section 9-102(a)(29) of the Uniform Commercial 20    Code.21    (e) A person seeking appointment of a receiver may 22nominate a person to serve as receiver, but the court is not 23bound by the nomination. 24    Section 8. Receiver's bond; alternative security. 25    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) and   HB0028 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1(c), a receiver shall post with the court a bond that:2        (1) is conditioned on the faithful discharge of the 3    receiver's duties;4        (2) has one or more sureties approved by the court;5        (3) is in an amount the court specifies; and6        (4) is effective as of the date of the receiver's 7    appointment.8    (b) The court may approve the posting by a receiver with 9the court of alternative security, such as a letter of credit 10or deposit of funds. The receiver may not use receivership 11property as alternative security. Interest that accrues on 12deposited funds must be paid to the receiver on the receiver's 13discharge. 14    (c) For good cause shown, the court may waive the 15requirement that the receiver post with the court a bond or 16alternative security required by this Section. 17    (d) The court may authorize a receiver to act before the 18receiver posts the bond or alternative security required by 19this Section. 20    Section 9. Status of receiver as lien creditor. On 21appointment of a receiver, the receiver has the status of a 22lien creditor:23        (1) under Sections 9-101 to 9-809 of the Uniform 24    Commercial Code as to receivership property that is 25    personal property or fixtures;  HB0028 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1        (2) under Sections 1 to 39 of the Conveyances Act as to 2    receivership property that is real property as to persons 3    with actual or constructive notice of the appointment and 4    to all other persons from the time of recording of the 5    order appointing the receiver pursuant to Section 12(c)(3) 6    of this Act; and7        (3) as if the receiver were a creditor that obtained a 8    judicial lien on all the receivership property, subject to 9    satisfying the recording requirements as to real property 10    described in Section 12(c)(3) of this Act. 11    Section 10. Security agreement covering after-acquired 12property. Except as otherwise provided by law of this State 13other than this Act, property that a receiver or owner 14acquires after appointment of the receiver is subject to a 15security agreement entered into before the appointment to the 16same extent as if the court had not appointed the receiver. 17    Section 11. Collection and turnover of receivership 18property. 19    (a) Unless the court orders otherwise, on demand by a 20receiver:21        (1) a person that owes a debt that is receivership 22    property and is matured or payable on demand or on order 23    shall pay the debt to or on the order of the receiver, 24    except to the extent the debt is subject to setoff or   HB0028 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    recoupment; and2        (2) subject to subsection (c), a person that has 3    possession, custody, or control of receivership property 4    shall turn the property over to the receiver.5    (b) A person that has notice of the appointment of a 6receiver and owes a debt that is receivership property may not 7satisfy the debt by payment to the owner. 8    (c) If a creditor has possession, custody, or control of 9receivership property and the validity, perfection, or 10priority of the creditor's lien on the property depends on the 11creditor's possession, custody, or control, the creditor may 12retain possession, custody, or control until the court orders 13adequate protection of the creditor's lien. 14    (d) The receiver may seek to compel a person to comply with 15the obligations of this Section by motion. The court may order 16a person that has possession, custody, or control of 17receivership property to turn over such property to the 18receiver.19    (e) Unless a bona fide dispute exists about a receiver's 20right to possession, custody, or control of receivership 21property, the court may sanction as civil contempt a person's 22failure to turn the property over when required by this 23Section. 24    Section 12. Powers and duties of receiver. 25    (a) Except as limited by court order or law of this State   HB0028 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1other than this Act, a receiver may:2        (1) collect, control, manage, conserve, and protect 3    receivership property;4        (2) operate a business constituting receivership 5    property, including preservation, use, sale, lease, 6    license, exchange, collection, or disposition of the 7    property in the ordinary course of business;8        (3) in the ordinary course of business, incur 9    unsecured debt and pay expenses incidental to the 10    receiver's preservation, use, sale, lease, license, 11    exchange, collection, or disposition of receivership 12    property and otherwise in the performance of the 13    receiver's duties, including the power to pay obligations 14    incurred prior to the receiver's appointment if, in the 15    receiver's business judgment, payment is necessary to 16    preserve the value of receivership property using funds 17    that are not subject to any lien or right of setoff in 18    favor of a creditor who has not consented to the payment;19        (4) incur debt under a secured obligation in effect as 20    of the receiver's appointment subject to the same terms, 21    conditions, and lien priorities that existed as of the 22    receiver's appointment;23        (5) assert a right, claim, cause of action, or defense 24    of the owner which relates to receivership property and 25    maintain in the receiver's name or owner's name any action 26    to enforce any such right, claim, cause of action, or   HB0028 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    defense and intervene in actions in which owner is a party 2    for the purpose of exercising any rights pursuant to this 3    subsection (a)(5) or requesting transfer of venue of the 4    action to the court;5        (6) seek and obtain instruction from the court 6    concerning receivership property, exercise of the 7    receiver's powers, and performance of the receiver's 8    duties; 9        (7) on subpoena, compel a person to submit to 10    examination under oath, or to produce and permit 11    inspection and copying of designated records or tangible 12    things, with respect to receivership property or any other 13    matter that may affect administration of the receivership; 14        (8) engage a professional as provided in Section 15; 15        (9) apply to a court of another state for appointment 16    as ancillary receiver with respect to receivership 17    property located in that state; and18        (10) exercise any power conferred by court order, this 19    Act, or law of this State other than this Act.20    (b) With court approval, a receiver may:21        (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a)(4), 22    incur debt for the use or benefit of receivership property 23    other than in the ordinary course of business provided 24    that any lien securing such indebtedness is junior to any 25    existing liens on the receivership property, unless 26    otherwise authorized by the law of this State other than   HB0028 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    this Act;2        (2) make improvements to receivership property;3        (3) use, sell, lease, or transfer receivership 4    property other than in the ordinary course of business as 5    provided in Section 16 and execute in the owner's name any 6    documents, conveyances, and consents as may be required 7    for such use, sale, lease, or transfer;8        (4) assume or reject an executory contract of the 9    owner as provided in Section 17;10        (5) pay compensation to the receiver as provided in 11    Section 21, and to each professional engaged by the 12    receiver as provided in Section 15;13        (6) recommend allowance or disallowance of a claim of 14    a creditor as provided in Section 20;15        (7) make a distribution of receivership property as 16    provided in Section 20;17        (8) settle or release any rights, claims, causes of 18    action, or defenses or the owner asserted in subsection 19    (a)(5); and20        (9) abandon to the owner any receivership property 21    that is burdensome or is not of material value to the 22    receivership.23    (c) A receiver shall:24        (1) prepare and retain appropriate business records 25    from the receiver's appointment until the receiver's 26    discharge, including a record of each receipt,   HB0028 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    disbursement, and disposition of receivership property; 2        (2) account for receivership property, including the 3    proceeds of a sale, lease, license, exchange, collection, 4    or other disposition of the property;5        (3) promptly file or record, as applicable, with the 6    county recorder's office in the county where the real 7    property is located, a notice of the receivership setting 8    forth the name of the receiver, the owner of the real 9    property, the title of the action, a legal description of 10    the real property, if any, and a copy of the order 11    appointing the receiver;12        (4) disclose to the court any fact arising during the 13    receivership which would disqualify the receiver under 14    Section 7; and15        (5) perform any duty imposed by court order, this Act, 16    or law of this State other than this Act. 17    (d) The recording of the notice of the receivership set 18forth in subsection (c) shall constitute constructive notice 19of the receivership to every person subsequently acquiring an 20interest in or a lien on the real property affected thereby.21    (e) A subordination agreement is enforceable to the same 22extent that it is enforceable under the law of this State other 23than this Act. 24    (f) The powers and duties of a receiver may be expanded, 25modified, or limited by court order.   HB0028 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    Section 13. Duties of owner. 2    (a) An owner shall:3        (1) assist and cooperate with the receiver in the 4    administration of the receivership and the discharge of 5    the receiver's duties;6        (2) preserve and turn over to the receiver all 7    receivership property in the owner's possession, custody, 8    or control;9        (3) identify all records and other information 10    relating to the receivership property, including a 11    password, authorization, or other information needed to 12    obtain or maintain access to or control of the 13    receivership property, and make available to the receiver 14    the records and information in the owner's possession, 15    custody, or control; 16        (4) on subpoena, submit to examination under oath by 17    the receiver concerning the acts, conduct, property, 18    liabilities, and financial condition of the owner or any 19    matter relating to the receivership property or the 20    receivership; and21        (5) perform any duty imposed by court order, this Act, 22    or law of this State other than this Act.23    (b) Without limiting the owner's obligations under 24subsection (a), and unless the court orders otherwise, the 25owner shall file with the court and provide the receiver 26within 14 days of the receiver's appointment:  HB0028 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1        (1) A list of all receivership property and exempt 2    property of the owner, identifying:3            (A) The location of the property, including the 4        legal description of any real property;5            (B) A description of all liens to which the 6        property is subject; and 7            (C) The estimated value of the property.8        (2) A list of all creditors, taxing authorities, and 9    regulatory authorities having claims against the owner:10            (A) their mailing addresses;11            (B) the amount and nature of their respective 12        claims as of the date of the receiver's appointment;13            (C) whether the claims are secured by liens; and 14            (D) whether the claims are disputed.15    (c) If an owner is a person other than an individual, this 16Section applies to each officer, director, manager, member, 17partner, trustee, or other person exercising or having the 18power to exercise control over the affairs of the owner.19    (d) If a person knowingly fails to perform a duty imposed 20by this Section, the court may:21        (1) award the receiver actual damages caused by the 22    person's failure, reasonable attorney's fees, and costs;23        (2) sanction the failure as civil contempt; and24        (3) impose other equitable remedies, including an 25    injunction or constructive trust to address a person's 26    failure to comply with a duty under this Section.   HB0028 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    Section 14. Stay; injunction. 2    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) or 3ordered by the court, an order appointing a receiver operates 4as a stay, applicable to all persons, of an act, action, or 5proceeding:6        (1) to obtain possession of, exercise control over, or 7    enforce a judgment against receivership property; and8        (2) to enforce a lien against receivership property to 9    the extent the lien secures a claim against the owner 10    which arose before entry of the order.11    (b) In addition to any stay provided in this Section, the 12court may enjoin an act, action, or proceeding against or 13relating to receivership property, the owner, or the receiver 14if the injunction is necessary to protect the receivership 15property or facilitate administration of the receivership.16    (c) A person whose act, action, or proceeding is stayed or 17enjoined under this Section may apply to the court for relief 18from the stay or injunction for cause, including lack of 19adequate protection.20    (d) An order appointing a receiver does not operate as a 21stay or injunction of:22        (1) an act, action, or proceeding to perfect, or 23    maintain or continue the perfection of, an interest in 24    receivership property, provided that if perfection of an 25    interest would require seizure of receivership property or   HB0028 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    commencement of an action, the perfection shall instead be 2    accomplished by filing with the court, and by serving upon 3    the receiver, notice of the interest within the time fixed 4    by law for seizure or commencement;5        (2) commencement or continuation of a criminal 6    proceeding;7        (3) commencement or continuation of an action or 8    proceeding, or enforcement of a judgment other than a 9    money judgment in an action or proceeding, by a 10    governmental unit to enforce its police or regulatory 11    power; 12        (4) establishment by a governmental unit of a tax 13    liability against the owner or receivership property or an 14    appeal of the liability; or15        (5) the exercise of rights of a party to a swap 16    agreement, securities contract, repurchase agreement, 17    commodity contract, forward contract, or master netting 18    agreement, as those terms are defined in the federal 19    Bankruptcy Code, to the extent that a court would not have 20    the power to stay the exercise if the owner were a debtor 21    under the Bankruptcy Code.22    (e) The court may void an act that violates a stay or 23injunction under this Section.24    (f) If a person knowingly violates a stay or injunction 25under this Section, the court may:26        (1) award actual damages caused by the violation,   HB0028 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    reasonable attorney's fees, and costs; and2        (2) sanction the violation as civil contempt.3    (g) If the stay under this Section enjoins the performance 4of an act or the commencement of an action or proceeding, the 5time established by law other than this Act, court order or 6contract to perform such act or commence such action or 7proceeding shall be tolled during the stay. 8    Section 15. Engagement and compensation of professionals. 9    (a) With court approval, a receiver may engage one or more 10attorneys, accountants, appraisers, auctioneers, brokers, or 11other professionals to assist the receiver in performing a 12duty or exercising a power of the receiver. The court may 13authorize the receiver's engagement of professionals on any 14reasonable terms and conditions of employment, including on a 15retainer, on an hourly basis, on a fixed or percentage fee 16basis, on a contingent fee basis or a combination of the 17foregoing. In connection with the proposed engagement of a 18professional, the receiver shall disclose to the court:19        (1) the identity and qualifications of the 20    professional;21        (2) the scope and nature of the proposed engagement;22        (3) any potential conflict of interest; and23        (4) the proposed compensation.24    (b) A person is not disqualified from engagement under 25this Section solely because of the person's engagement by,   HB0028 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1representation of, or other relationship with the receiver, a 2creditor, or a party. This Act does not prevent the receiver 3from serving in the receivership as an attorney, accountant, 4appraiser, auctioneer, broker, or other professional when 5authorized by law.6    (c) Subject to any procedures that the court may impose, 7the receiver or professionals engaged by the receiver under 8subsection (a) may be paid reasonable compensation for their 9services on an interim basis in the same manner as other 10expenses of administration and without the necessity of court 11approval.12    (d) Except to the extent the fees and expenses of the 13receiver or professionals engaged by the receiver under 14subsection (a) have been approved by the court, any interim 15payments of fees and expenses shall be approved in connection 16with the receiver's final report as provided in Section 23. 17The receiver or professionals seeking court approval of their 18fees and expenses shall file with the court such information 19as may be necessary for the court to determine the 20reasonableness of the requested fees and expenses. If engaged 21on an hourly basis, a receiver or professional shall file with 22the court an itemized statement of the time spent, work 23performed, and billing rate of each person that performed the 24work and an itemized list of expenses. The receiver shall pay 25the amount approved by the court.   HB0028 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    Section 16. Use or transfer of receivership property not 2in ordinary course of business. 3    (a) In this Section, "good faith" means honesty in fact 4and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair 5dealing.6    (b) With court approval, a receiver may use receivership 7property other than in the ordinary course of business.8    (c) With court approval, a receiver may transfer 9receivership property other than in the ordinary course of 10business by sale, lease, license, exchange, or other 11disposition. Unless the agreement of sale provides otherwise, 12a sale under this Section is free and clear of a lien of the 13person that obtained appointment of the receiver, any 14subordinate lien, and any right of redemption. However, unless 15the holder of a senior lien consents, such a sale:16        (1) is subject to the senior lien and to the rights and 17    remedies of the holder of the senior lien under law other 18    than this Act; and19        (2) does not affect the obligation secured by the 20    senior lien.21    (d) A lien on receivership property which is extinguished 22by a transfer under subsection (c) attaches to the proceeds of 23the transfer with the same validity, perfection, and priority 24the lien had on the property immediately before the transfer, 25even if the proceeds are not sufficient to satisfy all 26obligations secured by the lien.   HB0028 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    (e) A transfer under subsection (c) may occur by means 2other than a public auction sale. A creditor holding a valid 3lien on the property to be transferred may purchase the 4property and offset against the purchase price part or all of 5the allowed amount secured by the lien, if the creditor 6tenders funds sufficient to satisfy in full the reasonable 7expenses of transfer and the obligation secured by any senior 8lien extinguished by the transfer. 9    (f) A reversal or modification of an order approving a 10transfer under subsection (c) does not affect the validity of 11the transfer to a person that acquired the property in good 12faith or revive against the person any lien extinguished by 13the transfer, whether the person knew before the transfer of 14the request for reversal or modification, unless the court 15stayed the order before the transfer. 16    Section 17. Executory contracts. 17    (a) In this Section, "timeshare interest" means an 18interest having a duration of more than three years which 19grants its holder the right to use and occupy an 20accommodation, facility, or recreational site, whether 21improved or not, for a specific period less than a full year 22during any given year.23    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h), with 24court approval, a receiver may assume or reject an executory 25contract of the owner relating to receivership property. An   HB0028 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1executory contract may only be assumed or rejected by court 2order. The court may condition the receiver's assumption and 3continued performance of the executory contract on terms 4appropriate under the circumstances. If the receiver does not 5obtain court approval to assume or reject the executory 6contract by the termination of receivership, the receiver is 7deemed to have rejected the executory contract. At the request 8of the non-owner party to the executory contract, a court may 9set a reasonable time after the receiver's appointment to 10assume or reject an executory contract.11    (c) A receiver's performance of an executory contract 12before court approval under subsection (b) of its assumption 13or rejection is not an assumption of the contract and does not 14preclude the receiver from seeking approval to reject the 15contract.16    (d) A provision in an executory contract which requires or 17permits a forfeiture, modification, or termination of the 18contract because of the appointment of a receiver or the 19financial condition of the owner does not affect a receiver's 20power under subsection (b) to assume the contract.21    (e) A receiver's right to possess or use receivership 22property pursuant to an executory contract terminates upon 23rejection of the contract under subsection (b). Rejection of 24an executory contract constitutes a breach of the executory 25contract effective immediately before appointment of the 26receiver. A claim for damages for rejection of the contract   HB0028 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1shall be presented or filed in the same manner as other claims 2in the receivership no later than:3        (1) the time set for submitting a claim in the 4    receivership; or5        (2) 30 days after the court approves the rejection.6    (f) If, at the time a receiver is appointed, the owner has 7the right to assign an executory contract relating to 8receivership property under law of this State other than this 9Act, the receiver may assign the contract with court approval 10and subject to the terms of the contract.11    (g) If a receiver rejects under subsection (b) an 12executory contract for the sale of receivership property that 13is real property in possession of the purchaser or a 14real-property timeshare interest, the purchaser may:15        (1) treat the rejection as a termination of the 16    contract, and in that case the purchaser has a lien on the 17    property for the recovery of any part of the purchase 18    price the purchaser paid; or19        (2) retain the purchaser's right to possession under 20    the contract, and in that case the purchaser shall 21    continue to perform all obligations arising under the 22    contract and may offset any damages caused by 23    nonperformance of an obligation of the owner after the 24    date of the rejection, but the purchaser has no right or 25    claim against other receivership property or the receiver 26    on account of the damages.  HB0028 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    (h) A receiver may not reject an unexpired lease of real 2property under which the owner is the landlord if:3        (1) the tenant occupies the leased premises as the 4    tenant's primary residence;5        (2) the receiver was appointed at the request of a 6    person other than a mortgagee; or7        (3) the receiver was appointed at the request of a 8    mortgagee and:9            (A) the lease is superior to the lien of the 10        mortgage;11            (B) the tenant has an enforceable agreement with 12        the mortgagee or the holder of a senior lien under 13        which the tenant's occupancy will not be disturbed as 14        long as the tenant performs its obligations under the 15        lease;16            (C) the mortgagee has consented to the lease, 17        either in a signed record or by its failure timely to 18        object that the lease violated the mortgage; or19            (D) the terms of the lease were commercially 20        reasonable at the time the lease was agreed to and the 21        tenant did not know or have reason to know that the 22        lease violated the mortgage. 23    Section 18. Defenses and immunities of receiver. 24    (a) A receiver is entitled to all defenses and immunities 25provided by law of this State for an act or omission within the   HB0028 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1scope of the receiver's appointment.2    (b) Approval of the court that appointed the receiver must 3be obtained before the commencement of an action or proceeding 4against the receiver or a professional engaged by the receiver 5regarding an act or omission in administering receivership 6property.7    (c) A party or party in interest may conduct discovery of 8the receiver concerning any matter relating to the receiver's 9administration of the receivership property after obtaining an 10order authorizing the discovery. 11    Section 19. Interim report of receiver. A receiver may 12file or, if ordered by the court, shall file an interim report 13that includes:14        (1) the dates covered by the interim report;15        (2) the activities of the receiver since appointment 16    or a previous report;17        (3) receipts and disbursements, including a payment 18    made or proposed to be made to a professional engaged by 19    the receiver;20        (4) receipts and dispositions of receivership 21    property;22        (5) fees and expenses of the receiver and, if not 23    filed separately, a request for approval of payment of the 24    fees and expenses; and25        (6) any other information required by the court.   HB0028 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    Section 20. Notice of appointment; claim against 2receivership; distribution to creditors. 3    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h), a 4receiver shall give notice of appointment of the receiver to 5all creditors of the owner by:6        (1) deposit for delivery through first-class mail or 7    other commercially reasonable delivery method to the 8    last-known address of each creditor; and9        (2) such other means as directed by the court.10    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h), the 11notice required by subsection (a) must specify the date by 12which each creditor holding a claim against the owner which 13arose before appointment of the receiver must file the claim 14with the court. The date specified must be at least 60 days 15after the date of the notice under subsection (a). Unless the 16court orders otherwise, a claim that is not timely filed with 17the court is not entitled to a distribution from the 18receivership.19    (c) A claim filed by a creditor under this subsection 20shall be titled "Proof of Claim" and must:21        (1) state the name and address of the creditor;22        (2) state the amount and basis of the claim;23        (3) identify any property securing the claim;24        (4) be signed by the creditor or an authorized agent 25    under penalty of perjury; and  HB0028 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1        (5) include a copy of any record on which the claim is 2    based.3    (d) An assignment by a creditor of a claim against the 4owner or receivership is effective against the receiver only 5if the assignee gives timely notice of the assignment to the 6receiver in a signed record prior to the entry of an order 7approving a receiver's final report.8    (e) A claim filed with the court in accordance with 9subsections (b) and (c) constitutes prima facie evidence of 10the validity and amount of the claim. At any time before entry 11of an order approving a receiver's final report, the receiver 12or other person with an interest in the receivership may file 13with the court an objection to a claim of a creditor, stating 14the basis for the objection. The court shall allow or disallow 15the claim according to the law of this State other than this 16Act. 17    (f) Upon motion of the receiver or other person with an 18interest in the receivership, the following claims may be 19estimated for purpose of allowance under this Section:20        (1) any contingent or unliquidated claims, the fixing 21    or liquidation of which would unduly delay the 22    administration of the receivership; or23        (2) any right to payment arising from a right to an 24    equitable remedy for breach of performance.25    (g) Claims subject to estimation under subsection (f) 26shall be allowed in the estimated amount as determined by the   HB0028 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1court.2    (h) If the court concludes that receivership property is 3likely to be insufficient to satisfy claims of each creditor 4holding a perfected lien on the property, the court may order 5that:6        (1) the receiver need not give notice under subsection 7    (a) of the appointment to all creditors of the owner, but 8    only such creditors as the court directs; and9        (2) unsecured creditors need not submit claims under 10    this Section.11    (i) Subject to Section 21:12        (1) a distribution of receivership property to a 13    creditor holding a perfected lien on the property must be 14    made in accordance with the creditor's priority under law 15    of this State other than this Act;16        (2) a distribution of receivership property to a 17    creditor with an allowed unsecured claim must be made as 18    the court directs on a pro rata basis according to law of 19    this State other than this Act; and 20        (3) if all of the creditors holding claims have been 21    paid in full, any residue shall be paid to the owner. 22    Section 21. Fees and expenses. 23    (a) The court may award a receiver from receivership 24property the reasonable and necessary fees and expenses of 25performing the duties of the receiver and exercising the   HB0028 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1powers of the receiver.2    (b) The court may order one or more of the following to pay 3the reasonable and necessary fees and expenses of the 4receivership, including reasonable attorney's fees and costs:5        (1) a person that requested the appointment of the 6    receiver, if the receivership does not produce sufficient 7    funds to pay the fees and expenses; or8        (2) a person whose conduct justified or would have 9    justified the appointment of the receiver under Section 10    6(a)(1) or 6(a)(3)(D). 11    Section 22. Removal of receiver; replacement; termination 12of receivership. 13    (a) The court may remove a receiver for cause.14    (b) The court shall replace a receiver that dies, resigns, 15or is removed.16    (c) If the court finds that a receiver that resigns or is 17removed, or the representative of a receiver that is deceased, 18has accounted fully for and turned over to the successor 19receiver all receivership property and has filed a report of 20all receipts and disbursements during the service of the 21replaced receiver, the replaced receiver is discharged.22    (d) The court may discharge a receiver and terminate the 23court's administration of the receivership property if the 24court finds that appointment of the receiver was improvident 25or that the circumstances no longer warrant continuation of   HB0028 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1the receivership. If the court finds that the appointment was 2sought wrongfully or in bad faith, the court may assess 3against the person that sought the appointment:4        (1) the fees and expenses of the receivership, 5    including reasonable attorney's fees and costs; and6        (2) actual damages caused by the appointment, 7    including reasonable attorney's fees and costs. 8    Section 23. Final report of receiver; discharge. 9    (a) Unless excused by the court, on completion of a 10receiver's duties, the receiver shall file a motion seeking 11approval of a final report and termination of the court's 12administration of the receivership property. 13    (b) The final report shall include:14        (1) a description of the activities of the receiver in 15    the conduct of the receivership;16        (2) a list of receivership property at the 17    commencement of the receivership and any receivership 18    property received during the receivership;19        (3) a list of disbursements, including payments to 20    professionals engaged by the receiver;21        (4) a list of dispositions of receivership property;22        (5) a list of distributions made or proposed to be 23    made from the receivership for creditor claims; 24        (6) if not filed separately, a request for approval of 25    the payment of fees and expenses of the receiver and the   HB0028 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    receiver's professionals; and2        (7) any other information required by the court.3    (c) If the court approves a final report filed under 4subsection (a) and the receiver distributes all receivership 5property, the receiver is discharged and the court's 6administration of the receivership property is terminated. The 7order approving a final report and termination of the 8receivership shall include such additional terms as the court 9deems appropriate. 10    Section 24. Receivership in another state; ancillary 11proceeding. 12    (a) The court may appoint a foreign receiver as an 13ancillary receiver with respect to property located in this 14State or subject to the jurisdiction of the court for which a 15receiver could be appointed under this Act, if:16        (1) the person would be eligible to serve as receiver 17    under Section 7 of this Act; and18        (2) the appointment furthers the person's possession, 19    custody, control, or disposition of property subject to 20    the receivership in the other state.21        (3) the appointment is authorized by the court that 22    appointed the foreign receiver.23    (b) The court may issue an order that gives effect to an 24order entered in another state appointing or directing a 25receiver.  HB0028 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    (c) Unless the court orders otherwise, an ancillary 2receiver appointed under subsection (a) has the rights, 3powers, duties and obligations of a receiver appointed under 4this Act. 5    Section 25. Effect of enforcement by secured party. A 6request by a secured party for appointment of a receiver, the 7appointment of a receiver, or application by a secured party 8of receivership property or proceeds to the secured obligation 9does not:10        (1) make the secured party a mortgagee in possession 11    of real property;12        (2) impose any duty on the secured party under Section 13    9-207 of the Uniform Commercial Code; 14        (3) make the secured party an agent of the owner;15        (4) constitute an election of remedies that precludes 16    a later action to enforce the secured obligation;17        (5) make the secured obligation unenforceable; or18        (6) limit any right available to the secured party 19    with respect to the secured obligation. 20    Section 26. Uniformity of application and construction. In 21applying and construing this uniform Act, consideration must 22be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with 23respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.   HB0028 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 03780 JRC 13804 b1    Section 27. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global 2and National Commerce Act. This Act modifies, limits, or 3supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National 4Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not 5modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that Act, 15 6U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of 7any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that Act, 15 8U.S.C. Section 7003(b). 9    Section 28. Transition. This Act does not apply to a 10receivership for which the receiver was appointed before the 11effective date of this Act. 12    Section 29. Inapplicability. The provisions of Section 132-415 of the Code of Civil Procedure do not apply to a 14receivership under this Act.